Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 3

Committee Investigations

3-3-101. “Committee” defined.

“Committee,” as used in this chapter, except when more particularly provided in this chapter, includes:

A committee appointed by either the house of representatives or the senate;

A committee appointed by the joint action of such bodies;

A committee appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives or the speaker of the senate or a joint committee appointed by both speakers in accordance with the rules of proceedings adopted by the respective houses; and

Any subcommittee designated out of the membership of any such committee;

when any such committee or subcommittee thereof is charged with any duty to make investigation and report, to or for the benefit of either or both houses, in respect of any matter or thing referred to any such committee.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.1; Acts 1974, ch. 613, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-301.

Cross-References. Committees, miscellaneous provisions, title 3, ch. 4.

Special committees on revision of laws, §3-12-104.

Standing or select committees, subpoena power, §3-4-101.

Standing, special or select committees, expenses and mileage, §§3-3-105,3-4-102,3-4-103.

Standing, special or select committees, interim meetings, reports, powers and expenses, §3-4-102.

Law Reviews.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Collateral References.

Formalities and requisites of the creation of legislative committees. 28 A.L.R. 1154.

3-3-102. Scope of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to all committees authorized and appointed at any session of the general assembly.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 17; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 172.17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-302.

3-3-103. Meetings of committees — Rules — Place of hearings.

Any such committee, so acting on behalf of either or both houses of the general assembly, shall always be and remain subject to the call of the chair of such committee, or in the absence of such chair, or in the event of the chair's failure for any reason to act, subject to the call of a majority of the membership of such committee.

A quorum of such committee shall consist of a majority of the membership thereof, and a quorum of the entire primary committee shall have power to make and enforce rules regulating the conduct of the business of such committee, or any subcommittee designated by it from its membership as hereinafter provided.

Such subcommittee or subcommittees as hereinafter provided may conduct hearings at such points in this state as may be deemed advisable by any such primary committee.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-303.

Cross-References. Standing committees, interim meetings, §3-4-102.

3-3-104. Employment of personnel — Records.

Any such primary committee, appointed and acting by and on behalf of either or both houses of the general assembly, as contemplated and provided in this chapter, is given authority and power, unless otherwise directed by the house or houses of the general assembly for which the committee is acting, to employ one (1) or more sergeants-at-arms, and necessary or proper legal counsel, investigators and clerks, and a stenographer or stenographers, to take down and typewrite and make a record of the testimony given before any such committee, as well as all other data and information assembled and procured under the directions of such committee.

All such records, after use by such committee and the house or houses of the general assembly appointing it, shall be finally lodged and filed in the office of the secretary of state, and kept therein for public inspection, as other public records, statutes, etc., are kept and retained in such office.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-304.

3-3-105. Compensation of employees.

The compensation to be paid to any sergeants-at-arms, counsel, investigators, clerks and stenographers, for performing their duties under this chapter, shall be in pursuance of appropriations to be made in the miscellaneous appropriation bill, out of any funds in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-305.

3-3-106. Subcommittees — Appointment and powers.

In order to expedite and efficiently perform its duties, any such committee, unless otherwise ordered and directed by the house or houses for which such committee may be acting, may appoint and designate out of its own membership, a subcommittee or subcommittees, to consist of one (1) or more of the members of such committee.

Such subcommittee or subcommittees, when so designated and directed by such committee, and subject to such restrictions as the committee may impose, shall be and are authorized and empowered, on behalf of such committee, and on behalf of the house or houses of the general assembly for which such committee has been authorized to act, to proceed with the work and investigations of such committee, including the assembling of desired information and data, and the subpoenaing and taking of testimony of witnesses, and having a record thereof made, for the later use of such committee and the house or houses of the general assembly for which such committee has been authorized to act.

Any such subcommittee or subcommittees, when acting in pursuance of the orders and directions of the committee from whose membership they have been selected, shall have and possess all the power and authority conferred by this chapter upon the committee from the membership of which such subcommittee has been designated, and any person or witness failing to obey a subpoena to appear and testify and produce any evidence, documentary or otherwise, before such subcommittee, is guilty of contempt, and may be dealt with therefor, as provided in § 3-3-111 in respects to all persons or witnesses subpoenaed to appear and appearing before any committee. Any such person or witness subpoenaed to appear or appearing before any such subcommittee who makes default in respect of such appearance, the giving of testimony or the production of any evidence, documentary or otherwise, before any subcommittee, commits a criminal offense, and upon indictment, trial and conviction therefor, shall be punished by fine and imprisonment, in all respects as provided in § 3-3-112 in regard to offending persons or witnesses subpoenaed to appear or appearing before any committee as set out and declared in §§ 3-3-112 — 3-3-114 and 3-3-120.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-306.

Cross-References. Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.

Contempt powers of courts, §16-1-103.

3-3-107. Assistants for subcommittees.

When, under the authority of this chapter, any such committee shall designate, out of its own membership, any such subcommittee or subcommittees to act for it and to proceed with its work and investigation as provided in §3-3-106, then such committee, from among its authorized aides, shall designate necessary sergeants-at-arms, counsel, investigators, clerks and stenographers, who shall attend upon the work of any such subcommittee and give to it the necessary and proper aid and assistance in the performance of its duties, as ordered and directed by the committee, so designating from its membership such subcommittee or subcommittees.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-307.

3-3-108. Subpoena power.

Either house of the general assembly, acting in committee of the whole, or both houses acting in joint session or committee of the whole, or any committee of either or both houses, has the power, respectively, to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers or other evidence; and to that end each of them, respectively, has the power to issue subpoenas, including subpoenas duces tecum, to enforce the attendance of witnesses and the production of any records, documents, papers or other items of evidence, deemed to be material to any matter under inquiry or investigation by any of them respectively.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-308.

Cross-References. Select or standing committees, subpoena powers, §3-4-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 23.10.

Attorney General Opinions. Provision of information by controlled substance database advisory committee to member of the General Assembly regarding top prescribers, by profession, of controlled substances. OAG 11-24, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (3/18/11).

3-3-109. Service of subpoenas — Form.

Any such subpoenas may be delivered to, and, when so delivered, shall be served by the sergeant-at-arms of the senate, acting for it, or by the sergeant-at-arms of the house of representatives, acting for it, or by either of the sergeants-at-arms when the subpoena relates to a matter pending before both houses acting in joint session, or by a sergeant-at-arms to be appointed by any committee to act for it.

Any such sergeant-at-arms shall promptly serve, execute and make return of any such process delivered to the sergeant-at-arms, and has the power to deputize any person to serve, execute and make return of such process for and in the stead of the sergeant-at-arms, to the house or houses or committee issuing same.

Such subpoenas shall be signed, respectively, by the speaker or speaker pro tem of either house, or the chair of a committee of the whole of the house or houses, or by the chair or chair pro tem of any committee, issuing such subpoena; and same shall run in the name of the state of Tennessee, and the county in which the subpoena is issued, or is to be served, and may be in the usual form of subpoenas issuing out of courts of record of this state, requiring the attendance of witnesses and production of any such evidence before the bodies or committees issuing such subpoenas.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-309.

3-3-110. Offenses constituting contempt.

Any person who, after having been served with a subpoena to appear as provided in §3-3-109, fails to appear and makes willful default in that regard, or who, having appeared, willfully refuses to answer any question, propounded by any member of the committee or any legal counsel of such committee acting in its presence and by its permission, pertinent to the matter under investigation, or willfully refuses to produce any papers, documents, records, or other items of evidence, deemed to be material by any such body or committee, in any such pending inquiry or investigation, commits contempt in impeding the progress of such investigation and the proper functioning of such body or committee then engaged in such investigation.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-310.

Cross-References. Arrest and punishment for contempt of committee investigations, §3-3-111.

Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.

Contempt powers of courts, §16-1-103.

Law Reviews.

The Contempt Powers of Tennessee Courts (E. Michael Ellis), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 538 (1970).

3-3-111. Arrest and punishment for contempt.

Such body or committee has the right and power to issue and enforce process of arrest or attachment and impose penalty for disobedience and contempt, as contemplated, set out and provided in §3-3-110, to the same extent as belongs by law in this state to courts of record in instances of such like offending, and as now provided by law. In addition to being guilty of such offense so then, for the time being, impeding the progress of such investigation and inquiry and the functioning of such body or committee, such offending and contemptuous person commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-311; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Committee investigations, contempt, §3-3-110.

Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.

Contempt powers of courts, §16-1-103.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Law of Arrest (Rollin M. Perkins and Frank C. Rand), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 509 (1949).

3-3-112. Penalty for willful default of summoned witness.

Every person who, having been summoned as a witness by the authority of either house or of both houses of the general assembly, or by the authority of any standing or special committee of either house or any joint committee of both houses of the general assembly, to give testimony or to produce any papers, or other items of evidence, upon any matter under inquiry before either house, or both houses, or any such committee of either house or joint committee of both houses of the general assembly, willfully makes default, by failing to appear, or who, having appeared, willfully refuses to answer any question or to produce any papers or other evidence pertinent to the matter under inquiry, whether such question be propounded by any member of such committee, or by any legal counsel of such committee, in its presence and by its permission, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-312; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Prosecution by district attorney general, §3-3-121.

Law Reviews.

The Contempt Powers of Tennessee Courts (E. Michael Ellis), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 538 (1970).

3-3-113. Violation of § 3-3-112 as continuing offense — Limitation of prosecutions.

Any person willfully making default in appearance when subpoenaed, or who, having appeared, willfully refuses to answer any question or to produce any paper or other evidence, pertinent to the matter under inquiry, whether such question be propounded by any member of such committee, or by any legal counsel of such committee, in its presence or by its direction, in violation of § 3-3-112, commits a continuing offense under that section, so long as the default in appearance or refusal to answer or to produce such paper or other evidence, shall continue during such inquiry.

No such person guilty of violating § 3-3-112 shall be subject or liable to more than one (1) conviction for any one (1) violation of that section, and any indictment under that section shall be returned within five (5) years after the date of the final adjournment of the general assembly at which the inquiry or investigation was made or authorized.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-313.

Cross-References. Prosecution by district attorney general, §3-3-121.

3-3-114. Venue for violations of § 3-3-112.

Any person violating §3-3-112 shall be subject to indictment, trial and conviction in any county of this state in which, after having been subpoenaed, the person has gone, remains or may be found, while willfully disobeying the subpoena, or in which the person willfully fails to appear, as directed in the subpoena, or having appeared, willfully refuses to answer any question or produce any paper or other evidence pertinent to the matter under inquiry, as provided in §3-3-112.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-314.

Cross-References. Prosecution by district attorney general, §3-3-121.

3-3-115. Penalty for evasion of service.

Any person who, after having knowledge that an inquiry or investigation has been ordered by either house or both houses of the general assembly, willfully leaves and is absent from the county of such person's usual residence for the purpose of evading the service upon such person of any subpoena that thereafter might be issued to command such person to appear and give testimony or produce documents or other evidence in the course of any such inquiry or investigation, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-315; Acts 1989, ch. 519, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

3-3-116. Violation of § 3-3-115 as continuing offense — Venue — Limitation of prosecutions.

Any person violating § 3-3-115 commits a continuing offense during all the time such person is so willfully absent from the county of such person's usual residence for the purpose of evading any subpoena that might be issued for such person during the session of the general assembly which has ordered such investigation.

Such continuing offender shall be subject to indictment, trial and conviction, in any county of this state to which such person has gone, or in which such person remains or may be found during the continuance of such offense, as well as in the county of such person's usual residence from which such person has willfully gone and is absent for the purpose of evading the service of any such subpoena.

No such person guilty of violating § 3-3-115 shall be subject or liable to more than one (1) conviction for any one (1) violation, and any indictment under § 3-3-115 shall be returned within five (5) years after the date of the final adjournment of the session of the general assembly at which the inquiry or investigation, at which such offender has willfully sought to avoid appearing, was made or authorized.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-316.

3-3-117. Issuance of attachments.

Power is given to such committees or subcommittees to issue attachments to be served on all persons who may willfully violate any subpoena, rule or order, made or promulgated by such committee.

Such attachment may be served by a sergeant-at-arms of any such committee on the offending person, who shall be kept in the custody of the sergeant-at-arms and brought before such committee to be dealt with as such committee may determine, under the power and authority provided and given in this chapter.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-317.

3-3-118. Oaths of witnesses.

All such witnesses, when so subpoenaed, before giving their testimony before the bodies or committees subpoenaing them, shall take an oath or make affirmation as provided by law for witnesses appearing in a court of record of this state to give testimony in such court.

The speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, or a chair of a committee of the whole of either or both houses, or the chair or chair pro tem of any committee of either or both houses, is authorized and empowered to administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses appearing before any such committee.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, §§ 2, 3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 172.2, 172.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-318.

3-3-119. Self-incrimination.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or producing papers, documents, records, or other items of evidence, before houses of the general assembly, or any such committee of either or both houses, in obedience to a subpoena of those bodies or any such committee, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of such person, may tend to incriminate or subject such person to a penalty or forfeiture; but the testimony so given shall not be used in evidence against such person in any criminal prosecution in the courts of this state, seeking conviction for any offense about which such person has been required to testify, except for perjury in giving the testimony.

No such person so testifying, or producing such evidence, documentary or otherwise, in obedience to such subpoena shall thereafter be liable to indictment, prosecution or punishment for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing, concerning or with reference to which such person may testify, or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before those bodies or either of them or before any such committee, in obedience to any subpoena issued by them or either of them, in the course of such inquiry and investigation pending before them or any of them. Such person may plead or prove the giving of testimony accordingly in bar of such indictment or prosecution; provided, that the above immunity from use of any such testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, against such person and witness, and the above immunity from indictment, prosecution or punishment of such person and witness, shall be claimed by such person and witness declining to answer the particular question or questions which such person may think has a tendency to incriminate such person, upon the expressly stated claim or objection that an answer or answers may tend to incriminate the witness.

When, after making such claim and objection, the witness is nevertheless directed to make answer, and obeys such direction and makes answer accordingly, then the full immunity hereinbefore given and declared shall be possessed by such person and witness after being directed to make answer, notwithstanding the claim or objection that an answer may tend to incriminate the witness; provided, that any witness upon being called to testify or required to produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before such bodies, or a committee of either or both of them, may be given the option of signing a waiver of all such immunity, and if witness shall sign the waiver, then the testimony and evidence, documentary or otherwise, given or produced by such witness, shall be admissible against such person, if otherwise competent and relevant, in any criminal prosecution brought against any such person and witness.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-319.

Cross-References. Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Law of Arrest (Rollin M. Perkins and Frank C. Rand), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 509 (1949).

Attorney General Opinions. Immunity of members of the general assembly from the criminal offense of perjury, OAG 06-073 (4/21/06).

3-3-120. Perjury and subornation of perjury — Penalty.

Any person who willfully and corruptly swears or affirms falsely in any material manner, upon any oath or affirmation, in respect of any matter under inquiry before either house, or such committee of either house or joint committee of both houses, commits perjury and shall be subject to indictment, trial and conviction for such perjury.

Any person who corruptly procures another to swear or affirm falsely in any such inquiry commits subornation of perjury and shall be subject to indictment, trial and conviction for such offense.

A violation of this section is a Class E felony.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-320; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 15.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Perjury, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

Prosecution by district attorney general, §3-3-121.

3-3-121. Prosecution by district attorney general.

Whenever a witness, summoned by subpoena issued as hereinbefore provided, fails to appear, or, having appeared, fails to answer, as provided in § 3-3-112, and the facts are reported to either house, the speaker of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, as the case may be or the chair of the committee in any event, shall certify such facts forthwith to the district attorney general for any county or counties in which such failing or refusing witness is subject to indictment and trial under this chapter, whose duty it shall be to bring the matter before the grand jury for its action, at the first opportunity, and to prosecute such offending witness by virtue of the office as such district attorney general, and is also the district attorney general's duty ex officio to prefer an indictment against such offending person.

It is also the duty of the district attorney general for any county or counties in which any person or witness is subject to indictment and trial under §§ 3-3-113, 3-3-114 and 3-3-120, to bring the matter of any violations of those sections before the grand jury for its action, at the first opportunity, and to prosecute such offending person by virtue of the office as such district attorney general, and it is the district attorney general's duty ex officio to prefer an indictment against such offending person.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-321.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477 (1978).

3-3-122. Compensation of witnesses.

Any person or persons subpoenaed to appear as a witness before any such committee, or subcommittee, shall be entitled to compensation including travel pay, as is now provided by law in respect of witnesses subpoenaed to appear in civil cases in courts of record of this state.

Such compensation for witnesses, when certified as due and payable by the chair of any such committee, or the member or members thereof acting as such subcommittee, shall be paid by the state treasurer, upon warrants drawn by the commissioner of finance and administration, out of any funds of the state not otherwise appropriated.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 15; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 172.15; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-322.

3-3-123. Committee reports on investigations.

Upon the completion of any investigation, made as herein contemplated and provided, the committee making such investigation shall then report its findings, embodying its recommendations, to the house or houses of the general assembly by which such committee was authorized and empowered to act.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-323.

Cross-References. Standing committees, joint meetings, reports, §3-4-102.

3-3-124. Legislative powers unabridged.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as inconsistent with the continued reservation by each house of the general assembly of the right and purpose at all times directly to exercise, in all proper cases, all other powers necessary for a branch of the general assembly as expressly declared in article II, § 12 of the Constitution of Tennessee.

Nor shall anything in this chapter be construed as inconsistent with the continued power and purpose of each house of the general assembly directly to deal with any matter of contempt intrinsic to the right of either house to preserve the means of discharging its legislative duties, when any person willfully fails and refuses to appear and testify regarding any matter under inquiry or investigation as provided and authorized by the direct action of either or both houses of the general assembly.

Nor shall anything in this chapter be construed as providing that any person who commits any contempt of either house of the general assembly, which, under the law, can be directly dealt with by either house for the purpose of enabling the house to perform its legislative duties, shall be imprisoned, as the result of the action of either house, or any committee of either or both houses of the general assembly, without indictment and court trial, for any term of imprisonment which shall extend beyond the session of the general assembly during which such imprisonment shall have been ordered.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-324.

3-3-125. Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in favor of making more effective any investigation ordered by either or both houses of the general assembly for the purpose of obtaining information to aid the general assembly, or either house thereof, in the performance of its legislative duties and obligations to the people of this state.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 172.19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-325.